Texas statutes.
AGRICULTURE CODE

TITLE 2. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

CHAPTER 15. FARMERS MARKET NUTRITION PROGRAMS

Sec. 15.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Farmers market" means a location at which a group of two or more farmers that are certified under the department's farmers market certification program offer produce for retail sale.

(2) "Food coupon" means any redemptive coupon issued by the Department of State Health Services under this chapter that is exchangeable only for produce at a farmers market.

(3) "Produce" means fresh fruits or vegetables.

(4) "W.I.C. program" means the federal special supplemental food program for women, infants, and children administered by the Department of State Health Services.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1191, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 6.001, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 15.002. ESTABLISHMENT OF SPECIAL NUTRITION PROGRAM. The Department of State Health Services may establish a special nutrition program to distribute to certain participants of the W.I.C. program food coupons that are redeemable only at farmers markets located in areas in which the program is implemented.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1191, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 6.002, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 15.003. ELIGIBILITY; AMOUNT OF ALLOTMENT. (a) A person is eligible to participate in the special nutrition program if the person is enrolled in the W.I.C. program and resides in an area in which the special nutrition program is implemented. The Department of State Health Services shall determine the eligibility of potential participants.

(b) Only the Department of State Health Services may determine the dollar amount of each participant's monthly allotment of food coupons.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1191, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 6.003, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 15.005. RULES. The executive commissioner of the Health and Human Services Commission shall adopt rules under this chapter that provide for:

(1) the design, printing, and denominations of the food coupons;

(2) the procedure for the delivery of the food coupons to participants;

(3) the procedure for the redemption of food coupons by the sellers of the produce; and

(4) other rules necessary for carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1191, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 6.004, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 15.007. PROGRAM FUNDS. The Department of State Health Services may accept gifts and grants from the federal government, the state, and private sources as well as legislative appropriations for the program authorized by this chapter. The use of gifts and grants other than legislative appropriations is subject, after their appropriation, only to limitations contained in the gift or grant.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1191, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 6.005, eff. April 2, 2015.